Utah statutes.
78A-7-113.   Delivery of docket and papers to successor.
A justice court judge upon the expiration of his term of office shall deposit
with his successor his dockets and all papers filed in his office and also
those of his predecessors or any others in his custody.  The dockets and
papers shall be kept as public records.
